Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 12 Appeal, Exceptions and New Trial

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Criminal Procedure — The State's Right to Appeal in Criminal Cases. State v. Heiner, 683 P.2d 629,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 284

(Wyo. 1984)”, see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 723 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of indigent defendant in criminal case to prosecute appeals in forma pauperis, 55 ALR2d 1072.

Appeal by state of order granting new trial in criminal case, 95 ALR3d 596.

Consequences of prosecution's failure to file timely brief in appeal by accused, 27 ALR4th 213.

Abatement of state criminal case by accused's death pending appeal of conviction — modern cases, 80 ALR4th 189.